pl: Narzędzia kominkowe w zestawie: Szufelka na popiół; Pogrzebacz do popiołu; Miech; Miotła; Szczotka; Wiadro na węgiel; Szczypce do węgla; Szufelka; Rękawice; Szufla kominkowa; Torba na drewno; Chwytak do polan; Pogrzebacz; Grabie; Łopata; Podnośnik do siatki iskrochronnej; Stojak; Termometr; Szczypce; Pozostałe
es: Utensilios para chimenea incluidos: Cenicero; Rastrillo de cenizas; Fuelles; Escoba; Pincel; Cubo de carbón; Pinzas para carbón; Recipiente para el polvo; Guantes; Sartén de hierro fundido; Leñero de transporte; Pinzas de troncos; Atizador; Rastrillo; Pala redonda; Pantalla antichispas; Soporte; Termómetro; Pinzas; Otros
fi: Pakkaukseen sisältyvät takkatyökalut: Tuhkalaatikko; Tuhkaharava; Palkeet; Luuta; Sivellin; Hiilisanko; Hiilipihdit; Tuhkalapio; Hanskat; Uunipannu; Puunkantolaite; Klapipihdit; Hiilihanko; Harava; Lapio; Kipinäsuojan nostin; Jalusta; Lämpömittari; Keittiöpihdit; Muu
da: Pejseværktøj medfølger: Askeskuffe; Askerive; Blæsebælge; Kost; Børste; Kulspand; Kultang; Støvbakke; Handsker; Pejseskuffe; Brændebærer; Brændeopsamler; Ildrager; Rive; Skovl; Skærmløfter til gnister; Stativ; Termometer; Køkkentænger; Andet
ja: 付属の暖炉ツールアイテム: 灰受け; 灰かき; ふいご; ほうき; ブラシ; コールボックス; コールトング; ちり取り; 手袋; 炉床パン; ログキャリー; ロググラバー; 火かき棒; 熊手; シャベル; スパークスクリーンリフター; スタンド; 温度計; トング; その他
ru: Инструменты для камина в комплекте: Зольный ящик; Грабли для золы; Мехи; Метла; Щетка; Ведро для угля; Угольные щипцы; Совок для мусора; Перчатки; Подовый лист; Переноска для дров; Захват для дров; Кочерга; Грабли; Лопатка; Подъемник искрозащитного экрана; Подставка; Термометр; Щипцы; Другое
sv: Eldstadsverktyg som ingår: Askpanna; Askgrep; Bälgar; kvast; Borste; Kolhink; Koltänger; Sopskyffel; Handskar; Askplåt; Vedbärare; Vedgrepp; Poker; Kratta; Skyffel; Gnistskyddslyftare; Stativ; Termometer; Tänger; Övrigt
bg-BG: Включени инструменти за камина: Съд за пепел; Гребло за пепел; Духала; Метла; Четка; Кофа за въглища; Щипки за въглища; Лопатка; Ръкавици; Съд за камина; Кош за дърва; Щипка за дърва; Ръжен; Гребло; Лопата; Предпазител от искри; Стойка; Термометър; Щипки; Друго
it: Attrezzi per camino inclusi: Cassetto per cenere; Rastrello per cenere; Mantici; Scopino; Pennello; Secchio per carbone; Pinze per carbone; Paletta; Guanti; Padella per focolare; Porta ceppi; Pinza per ceppi; Poker; Rastrello; Pala; Sollevatore per schermo antiscintille; Supporto; Termometro; Pinze da cucina; Altro
nb: Peisverktøy inkludert: Askeskuffe; Askeriver; Belger; Koste; Børste; Kullbøtte; Kulltang; Støvpanne; Hansker; Ildpanne; Tømmertransportør; Tømmergriper; Poker; Rake; Spade; Gnistskjermløfter; Stativ; Termometer; Klyper; Annet
ro-RO: Accesorii pentru șemineu incluse: Tavă pentru cenușă; Greblă de cenușă; Foale; Mătură; Perie; Găleată de cărbuni; Clește de cărbuni; Făraș; Mănuși; Tavă pentru vatră; Suport pentru lemne; Clește pentru lemne; Vătrai; Greblă; Lopată; Ridicător ecran pentru scântei; Suport; Termometru; Clești; Altele
en: Fireplace tool items included: Ash pan; Ash rake; Bellows; Broom; Brush; Coal bucket; Coal tongs; Dust pan; Gloves; Hearth pan; Log carrier; Log grabber; Poker; Rake; Shovel; Spark screen lifter; Stand; Thermometer; Tongs; Other
nl: Meegeleverde haardsetaccessoires: Asbak; Ashark; Balgen; Bezem; Borstel; Kolenemmer; Kolentang; Stofblik; Handschoenen; Haardpan; Haardhoutdrager; Houtgrijper; Poker; Hark; Schop; Vonkenschermhandvat; Standaard; Thermometer; Tang; Overig
pt-BR: Ferramentas para lareira incluídas: Cinzeiro; Atiçador de cinzas; Foles; Vassoura; Pincel; Balde de carvão; Tenazes de carvão; Pá de lixo; Luvas; Bandeja de lareira; Suporte para lenha; Pegador de lenha; Pôquer; Ancinho; Pás; Levantador de tela contra faíscas; Suporte; Termômetro; Pegadores; Outro
cs: Zahrnuté krbové nářadí: Nádoba na popel; Pohrabáč; Měchy; Koště; Štětec; Kbelík na uhlí; Kleště na uhlí; Krbová lopatka; Rukavice; Krbová podložka; Taška na dřevo; Kleště na polena; Kutáč; Hrablo; Lopata; Zvedač ochranné mřížky proti jiskrám; Stojan; Teploměr; Krbové kleště; Jiné
de: Inbegriffene Kaminwerkzeugartikel: Aschepfanne; Ascherechen; Blasebälge; Besen; Bürste; Kohleeimer; Kohlezange; Kehrschaufel; Handschuhe; Kaminwanne; Brennholztasche; Kaminzange; Poker; Rechen; Schaufel; Funkenschutz; Ständer; Thermometer; Zange; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Priloženi pripomočki za kamin: Pepelnik; Grablje za pepel; Mehi; Metla; Čopič; Vedro za premog; Klešče za premog; Lopatica za prah; Rokavice; Ponev za kurišče; Prevoznik hlodov; Prijemalo hlodov; Poker; Grablje; Lopata; Dvigalo za zaslonke Spark; Stojalo; Termometer; Klešče; Druga
zh-TW: 壁爐工具包含項目: 貯灰盤; 灰耙; 風箱; 掃帚; 壁爐刷; 煤桶; 煤鉗; 畚箕; 手套; 爐灶盤; 原木搬運袋; 原木抓取鉗; 撥火棒; 壁爐耙; 壁爐鏟; 防火網夾鉗; 支架; 溫度計; 火鉗; 其他
zh-CN: 包含的壁炉工具物件: 灰盘; 灰耙; 风箱; 扫帚; 毛刷型; 煤桶; 煤钳; 簸箕; 手套; 炉前盘; 柴火提篮; 原木抓取器; 拨火棍; 耙子; 铲子; 防火网提手; 支架; 温度计; 夹钳; 其他
hu: Kandalló szerszám tartozékok: Hamutálca; Hamugereblye; Tüzelőfúvókák; Seprű; Ecset; Szénvödör; Szénfogók; Szemétlapát; Kesztyű; Sütőserpenyő; Fahasábtartó; Rönkfogó; Piszkavas; Gereblye; Lapát; Szikrafogó-emelő; Állvány; Hőmérő; Csipesz; Egyéb
el: Περιλαμβανόμενα εργαλεία τζακιού: Συρτάρι στάχτης; Τσουγκράνα στάχτης; Φυσητήρι; Σκουπάκι; Βούρτσα; Κουβάς κάρβουνου; Λαβίδα για κάρβουνα; Φαράσι; Γάντια; Φαράσι τζακιού; Θήκη/μεταφορέας ξύλων; Λαβίδα ξύλων; Σκαλιστήρι; Τσουγκράνα; Φτυάρι; Λαβή ανύψωσης προστατευτικής σήτας; Βάση; Θερμόμετρο; Λαβίδα; Άλλο
lt-LT: Židinio įrankių komplekte esantys elementai: Pelenų keptuvė; Pelenų grėblys; Dumplės; Šluota; Šepetėlis; Anglies kibiras; Anglių žnyplės; Šiukšlių semtuvėlis; Pirštinės; Židinio keptuvė; Rąstų vežėjas; Rąstų griebtuvas; Žarsteklis; Grėblys; Semtuvas; Kibirkščių tinklelio pakėlėjas; Stovas; Termometras; Žnyplės; Kita
hr-HR: Uključeni proizvodi alata za kamin: Posuda za pepeo; Grablje za pepeo; Mjehovi; Metla; Četka; Kanta za ugljen; Kliješta za ugljen; Lopatica za prašinu; Rukavice; Posuda za ognjište; Nosač za drva; Hvataljka za drva; Poker; Grablje; Lopata; Kuka za podizanje zaštitne mreže; Stalak; Termometar; Hvataljke; Ostalo
pt-PT: Ferramentas para lareira incluídas: Cinzeiro; Ancinho cinzas; Fole; Vassoura; Pincel; Balde de carvão; Tenazes de carvão; Pá do lixo; Luvas; Panela para lareira; Transportador de troncos; Agarrador de troncos; Atiçador; Ancinho; Pá; Elevador de rede de faíscas; Suporte; Termómetro; Tenazes; Outro
th: รายการอุปกรณ์สำหรับเตาผิงที่รวมอยู่ในชุด: ถาดรองขี้เถ้า; คราดขี้เถ้า; ที่เป่าลม; ไม้กวาด; แปรง; ถังใส่ถ่านหิน; คีมคีบถ่านหิน; ที่ตักฝุ่น; ถุงมือ; ถาดโกยขี้เถ้า; กระเป๋าใส่ฟืน; คีมคีบฟืน; ทรงโป๊กเกอร์; คราด; พลั่ว; ที่ยกตะแกรงกันสะเก็ดไฟ; แท่นวาง; เทอร์โมมิเตอร์; ที่คีบ; อื่นๆ
ko: 벽난로 도구 포함 품목: 재받이; 재갈퀴; 풀무; 빗자루; 브러시; 석탄 양동이; 석탄 집게; 쓰레받기; 글러브; 화로용 냄비; 장작 운반 캐리어; 장작 집게; 포커; 갈퀴; 삽; 스파크 스크린 리프터; 스탠드; 온도계; 집게; 기타
tr: Dahil olan şömine aletleri: Kül haznesi; Kül tırmığı; Körük; Süpürge; Fırça; Kömür kovası; Kömür maşası; Toz küreği; Eldiven; Şömine küreği; Kütük taşıma çantası; Kütük maşası; Kömür karıştırma şişi; Tırmık; Kürek; Kıvılcım siperliği kaldıracı; Stant; Termometre; Maşalar; Diğer
vi: Các dụng cụ lò sưởi đi kèm: Khay hứng tro; Cào tro; Bễ thổi lò; Chổi; Cọ; Xô đựng than; Kẹp gắp than; Xẻng hốt bụi; Găng tay; Khay lò sưởi; Giá vận chuyển củi; Dụng cụ gắp củi; Que chọc lửa; Cào; Xẻng; Dụng cụ nhấc lưới chắn tia lửa; Giá đỡ; Nhiệt kế; Kẹp gắp; Khác
sk-SK: Súčasťou balenia je aj náradie pre kozub: Zásuvka na popol; Hrable na popol; Dúchadlá; Metla; Kefa; Vedro na uhlie; Kliešte na uhlie; Lopatka na prach; Rukavice; Plech na popol; Nádoba na drevo; Kliešte na polená; Kutáč; Hrable; Lopata; Nástroj na zdvíhanie clony proti iskrám; Stojan; Teplomer; Kliešte; Iné
fr: Éléments inclus dans le set d’outils pour cheminée: Cendrier; Râteau à cendres; Soufflets; Balai; Brosse; Seau à charbon; Pinces à charbon; Pelle à poussière; Gants; Plateau de foyer; Porte-bûches; Pince à bûches; Poker; Râteau; Pelle; Lève-écran pare-étincelles; Support; Thermomètre; Pinces de cuisine; Autre